Hawaii statutes.
[§342P-30] Other action not barred.
No existing civil or criminal remedy for any wrongful action that is in
violation of any statute or any rule of the department or ordinance of any
county, shall be excluded or impaired by this chapter. [L 1991, c 219, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next